Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-22] Installment contracts for
purchase of property. (a) No person who has received, or whose assignor
has received, under a contract for the purchase of real or personal property,
or of lease or bailment with a view to purchase of that property, a deposit or
installment of the purchase price, or a deposit or installment under the
contract, lease, or bailment, from a person or from the assignor of a person
who, after the date of payment of such deposit or installment, has entered
military service, shall exercise any right or option under the contract to
rescind or terminate the contract or resume possession of the property for
nonpayment of any installment due or for any other breach of the terms
occurring prior to or during the period of such military service, except by
action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Any person who knowingly resumes
possession of property that is the subject of this section otherwise than as
provided in subsection (a) or in section 657D-6 or attempts so to do, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Upon the hearing of that action the court
may order the repayment of prior installments or deposits or any part thereof,
as a condition of terminating the contract and resuming possession of the
property, or on its own motion or on application to it by the person in
military service or a person on behalf of such person, shall order a stay of
proceedings as provided in this chapter unless, in the opinion of the court,
the ability of the defendant to comply with the terms of the contract is not
materially affected by reason of that service; or it may make such other
disposition of the case as may be equitable to preserve the interests of all
parties. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next